Washington statutes.
RCW 8.12.210

Title vests upon payment.

The court, upon proof that just compensation so found by the jury, or by the court in case the jury is waived, together with costs, has been paid to the person entitled thereto, or has been paid into court as directed by the court, shall enter an order that the city or town shall have the right at any time thereafter to take possession of or damage the property in respect to which such compensation shall have been so paid or paid into court as aforesaid, and thereupon, the title to any property so taken shall be vested in fee simple in such city or town.

[ 1907 c 153 s 17; RRS s 9231. Prior: 1905 c 55 s 17; 1893 c 84 s 17.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: CR 58.